dictsource/gd_rules
// Based on:
// http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Scottish_Gaelic_orthography

// front vowels
.L01 e è é i ì

// back vowels
.L02 a à á o ò ó u ù

// slender consonant followed by a back vowel
.L03 eall eann earr earn eadh eahg eo eò ioll ionn iu iù

.L04  b bh g gh m mh
.L05  ll m nn

.L06  l n r   // cause epenthetic vowel
.L07  l r s ch  // epenthetic after 'm'


// NOTES:
// Use phoneme [#] for possible preaspiration
// Use phoneme [&] for epenthetic vowel

.group a
        a        a
        a (dh_   o-
        a (dhA   o-
        a (gh_   o-
        a (ghA   o-
        a (L05K  aU
        a (rrK   a:
        a (rd    a:
        a (rn    a:
        
        a (g_    a2   // don't reduce to [@]
        ai (l_   a2
     @) ai        I

        ai       a
        ai (L05K  aI
        ai (mL07 E  // ? aimsir
        ai (bhC  aI
        ai (mhC  aI
        ai (rrK  a:
        ai (rd   a:
        ai (rn   a:

        ao       u-:
        aoi      u-I
        
        abh (C   a_|u
        amh (C   a_|u
        adh (C   o-:
        agh (C   o-:
        aidh (C  a_|i
        aigh (C  o-_|i
 
.group à
        à        a:
        ài       a:  // or E: ??
        
.group á
        á        a:
        ái       a:


.group e
        e        e

        @) ea (g_   a2  // unstressed
        @) ea       @

        ea       E
        ea (dh_  o-
        ea (gh_  o-
        ea (d    e
        ea (g    e
        ea (s    e
        ea (llK  aU
        ea (nnK  aU
        ea (rrK  a:
        ea (rn   a:
     _) ea (llA  ja
     _) ea (nnA  ja
     _) ea (rrA  ja
        ea (llA  a
        ea (nnA  a
        ea (rrA  a
        
        eagh (C  o-:  // ?? or O:
        eamh (C  E_|u
        
        ei       e
     @) ei       I   // unstressed
        ei (L05K eI
        
        eo       O
     _) eò       jO:
     _) eòi      jO:
        eò       O:
        eòi      O:
        
        eu       ia
        eu (m    e:

.group è
        è        E:  // or e:
        èi       E:  // or e:
        èa       ia
        
.group é
        é        e:
        éi       e:
        
.group i
        i        i
        i (L05K  i:
        i (mL07  i
        i (mh    i
        
        ia       i@  // or ia
        io       i
     _) io (llK  ju
     _) io (nnK  ju
        io (llK  u:
        io (nnK  u:
        
        iodh (C  i_|@
        iogh (C  i_|@
        
     _) iu       ju
        iu       u
        iu (rr   u:
        iu (rs   u:
        iù       u:
        iùi      u:
        
.group ì
        ì        i:
        ìo       i@

.group o
        o        O
        o (L04   o
        o (L05K  OU
        o (mh    o
        o (rrK   O:
        o (rd    O:
        o (rn    O:
        
        ogh (C   o:
        oibh (C  o-_i
        oigh (C  o-_i
        oimh (C  O_i
        
        oi       o-  // or O
        oi (L04  o
        oi (mh   o
        oi (L05K @I
        
.group ò
        ò        O:  // or o:
        òi       O:  // or o:
        
.group ó
        ó        o:
        ói       o:

.group u
        u        u
        u (L05K  u:
        u (rn    u:
        u (rr    u:
        u (_     u:

        ua       u@   // [ua] if followed by m or n ?
        uai      u@
        
        ui       u
        ui (m    u-
        ui (n    u-
        ui (s    u-
        ui (dh   u-I
        ui (L05K u-I
        ui (L05  u-
        
        uimh (C  u_|i
        
.group ù
        ù        u:
        ùi       u:

        
.group b
        b        b
        b (L03   bj  // try b;
        
   L06) b        &b     // insert epenthetic vowel
   L06) b (L03 &bj

.group bh
        bh       v
        bh (_    v
        bh (_+$w_alt1  // null
        bh (L03  vj
        // bh sometimes null between vowels or word-final
        
   L06) bh       &v
   L06) bh (_    &v
   L06) bh (L03  &vj
        
.group c
        c        k
     A) c (L02   #k
     A) c (_     #g
     C) c (_     g

        c (L01   k;
     A) c (L01   #k;
   L01) c (_     #g;
  L01C) c (_     g;


        ch       x
   L01) ch       C
        ch (L01  C
        chd      #g

   L06) ch       &x
L01L06) ch       &C
   L06) ch (L01  &C
        
        cn       kR

        
.group d
        d        d
   L01) d        d;
        d (L01   d;
        
        dh       Q
     A) dh (L02  Q   // or null
        dh (L01  J^
   L01) dh       J^
     A) dh (L01  
    ai) dh (_
    éi) dh (_

   
.group f
        f        f
        f (L03   fj
        fh

        
.group g
        g        g
   L01) g        g;
        g (L01   g;
        
   L06) g        &g
L01L06) g        &g;
   L06) g (L01   &g;

        gh       Q
        gh (_+$w_alt1   // null
     A) gh (L02  Q  // or null
   L01) gh       J^
        gh (L01  J^
     A) gh (L01
     
   L06) gh       &Q
L01L06) gh       &J^
   L06) gh (L01  &J^

        gn       gR


.group h
        h        h


.group j
        j        dZ

        
.group k
        k        k

        
.group l
        l        L
   L01) l        l
        l (L01   l
     _) l (L01   l^
        
        ll       L
   L01) ll       l^
        ll (L01  l^
        

.group m
        m        m
        m (L03   mj
        
   L06) m        &m      // epenthetic
   L06) m (L03   &mj
        m (L07   m&
        
        mh       v
        mh (L03  vj
  // mh between vowels sometimes null
  
   L06) mh       &v
   L06) mh (L03  &vj

   
.group n
        n        n
     _) n (L02   n[

 L02L01) n       n^  // slender after a back vowel
L02L01C) n       n^
L02L01CC) n       n^

        ng      Ng
   L01) ng      ng;
        ng (L01 ng;
        n (gh   n
    
        nn      n[
   L01) nn (+   n^
        nn (L01 n^


.group p
        p        p
     A) p (A     #p
     A) p (_     #b
     C) p (_     b
        p (L03   bj
     A) p (L03   #bj
     
        ph       f
        ph (L03  fj


.group q
        q        kw

        
.group r
        r        *
   L01) r        *;
        r (L01   *;
     _) r        R
        rr       R
        rt (_    *Sd
        rd (_    *Sd


.group s
        s        s
   L01) s        S
        s (L01   S
        
        sh       h
        sh (L03  hj


.group t
        t        t
     A) t (L02   #t
     A) t (_     #d
     C) t (_     d
     
        t (L01   t;
     A) t (L01   #t;
   L01) t (_     #d;
  L01C) t (_     d;
 L01CC) t (_     d;

        th       h
        th (L03  hj
        th (_          // ?
        // th between vowels may be null

        
.group v
        v       v
        

.group w
        w        w
        

.group x
        x        ks
     _) x        z
     
     
.group y
        y        i
        y (A     j
     A) y        j

.group z
        z        z
